Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.04.169 and 2018 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) "Electric-assisted bicycle" means a bicycle with two or three wheels, a saddle, fully operative pedals for human propulsion, and an electric motor. The electric-assisted bicycle's electric motor must have a power output of no more than ((seven hundred fifty))750 watts. The electric-assisted bicycle must meet the requirements of one of the following three classifications:(((1)))(a) "Class 1 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of ((twenty))20 miles per hour;(((2)))(b) "Class 2 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle and is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of ((twenty))20 miles per hour; or(((3)))(c) "Class 3 electric-assisted bicycle" means an electric-assisted bicycle in which the motor provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of ((twenty-eight))28 miles per hour and is equipped with a speedometer.(2) "Electric-assisted bicycle" does not include:(a) Any vehicle capable of exceeding 20 miles per hour on solely its electric motor; or(b) Any vehicle that is designed, manufactured, or intended by the manufacturer or seller to be easily configured in order not to meet the requirements of an electric-assisted bicycle, whether by a mechanical switch or button, by changing a setting in software controlling the drive system, by use of an online application, or through other means intended by the manufacturer or seller.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:"Electric motorcycle" means a motorcycle, as defined in RCW 46.04.330, that uses propulsion units powered solely by electricity and meets one or more of the following criteria:(1) Is not equipped with fully operable pedals capable of propelling it. Foot pegs are not considered pedals;(2) Has a motor with a power output that exceeds 750 watts;(3) Has a motor that provides exclusive electric assist to propel the vehicle over a speed of 20 miles per hour;(4) Has a motor that continues to provide assistance when the vehicle reaches a speed greater than 28 miles per hour.Sec. 3. RCW 46.04.330 and 2013 c 174 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not more than three wheels, not including any stabilizing conversion kits, on which the driver:(((1)))(a) Rides on a seat or saddle and the motor vehicle is designed to be steered with a handlebar; or(((2)))(b) Rides on a seat in a partially or completely enclosed seating area that is equipped with safety belts and the motor vehicle is designed to be steered with a steering wheel.(2) "Motorcycle" includes an "electric motorcycle."(3) "Motorcycle" excludes a farm tractor, a power wheelchair, an electric personal assistive mobility device, a motorized foot scooter, an electric-assisted bicycle, and a moped.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) The legislature recognizes the recent proliferation of electric motorcycle use statewide, especially among teenagers and young adults. The legislature also recognizes that there is a growing need to focus on the differences between electric-assisted bicycles and electric motorcycles to provide a clear means of distinguishing between the regulations that apply to each type of vehicle.(2)(a) The department of licensing must convene a work group to study and recommend:(i) Whether additional training or other investments could assist with uniform and consistent enforcement of rules of the road and equipment requirements applicable to all types of electric motorcycles;(ii) Whether establishing civil infractions and penalties related to the enforcement of rules of the road and equipment requirements when a minor is operating an electric motorcycle could assist with enforcement of rules of the road and equipment requirements; and(iii) Whether consumer protections related to a consumer's ability to distinguish between electric bicycles and electric motorcycles would facilitate adherence to the laws applicable to each category of vehicle.(b) The department may contract with a third-party consultant for work group support and to make recommendations on potential changes to state law.(c) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, the following members:(i) The secretary of the department of transportation or the secretary's designee;(ii) The executive director of the Washington traffic safety commission or the executive director's designee;(iii) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee;(iv) A representative from the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council;(v) A representative of the association of Washington cities;(vi) A representative of the Washington state association of counties;(vii) A representative of a nonprofit organization specializing in active transportation or electric bicycle safety;(viii) A representative of a trails organization that represents nonmotorized users who have encountered motor-powered vehicles on nonmotorized trails;(ix) A representative of a nonprofit motorcycle organization or a motorcycle rider; and(x) Any other representative deemed necessary by the department of licensing.(d) The work group must address the following topics:(i) Enforcement of motorcycle rules of the road and equipment requirements as applied to all types of electric motorcycles, including whether any category of electric motorcycles may not be subject to consistent enforcement across the state, and if not, how enforcement could be made more consistent across all types of electric motorcycles;(ii)(A) Exploration of the establishment of civil infractions that may be imposed by local jurisdictions on juveniles between the ages of 12 and 16 that may be adjudicated in courts of limited jurisdiction to avoid impacts on juvenile court operations;(B) Exploration of the establishment of civil penalties for adults who provide electric motorcycles to juveniles less than 16 years of age;(iii) Vehicle modifications that impact vehicle classification and may require vehicle reclassification, potential vehicle marketing practice and disclosure requirements related to vehicle classification that could assist consumers in distinguishing between electric-assisted bicycles and electric motorcycles, and any penalties that would be appropriate for violations of these requirements; and(iv) Any additional areas of focus the work group finds relevant to the objective of the assessment.(e) The work group must submit a final report, including any recommendations or draft legislation, to the office of the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Section 4 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---